Colorado statutes. Title 38. Property - Real and Personal
Part 1. Security Deposits - Wrongful Withholding

38-12-101.
Legislative declaration.

This part 1 shall be liberally construed to implement the intent of the general assembly to ensure the proper administration of security deposits and late fees and protect the interests of tenants, mobile home owners, and landlords.

History.

Source:
L. 71:

P. 592, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 58-1-26.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended,(SB 21-173), ch. 349, p. 2265, § 6, effective October 1.

38-12-102.
Definitions.

As used in this part 1, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Home owner” has the meaning set forth in section 38-12-201.5 (2).

“Landlord” means a landlord, as defined in section 38-12-502 (5), or the management or landlord of a mobile home park, as defined in section 38-12-201.5 (3).

“Late fee” means a monetary sum that a landlord charges a tenant or home owner as a result of the tenant’s or home owner’s failure to timely pay rent and that is determined pursuant to a rental agreement between the landlord and the tenant or home owner.

“Normal wear and tear” means deterioration that occurs, based upon the use for which a rental unit or mobile home space, as defined in section 38-12-201.5 (7), is intended, without negligence, carelessness, accident, or abuse of the premises or equipment or chattels by the tenant or home owner or members of the tenant’s or home owner’s household, or their invitees or guests.

“Rent subsidy provider” means a public or private entity, including a public housing authority, that provides ongoing financial assistance to a landlord for the purpose of subsidizing rent.

“Security deposit” means any advance or deposit of money, regardless of its denomination, the primary function of which is to secure the performance of a rental agreement for a residential premises or any part of a residential premises.

“Tenant” has the meaning set forth in section 38-12-502 (9).

History.

Source:
L. 71:

P. 592, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 58-1-27.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended,(SB 21-173), ch. 349, p. 2265, § 7, effective October 1.

38-12-103.
Return of security deposit.

A landlord shall, within one month after the termination of a lease or surrender and acceptance of the premises, whichever occurs last, return to the tenant the full security deposit deposited with the landlord by the tenant, unless the lease agreement specifies a longer period of time, but not to exceed sixty days. No security deposit shall be retained to cover normal wear and tear. In the event that actual cause exists for retaining any portion of the security deposit, the landlord shall provide the tenant with a written statement listing the exact reasons for the retention of any portion of the security deposit. When the statement is delivered, it shall be accompanied by payment of the difference between any sum deposited and the amount retained. The landlord is deemed to have complied with this section by mailing said statement and any payment required to the last known address of the tenant. Nothing in this section shall preclude the landlord from retaining the security deposit for nonpayment of rent, abandonment of the premises, or nonpayment of utility charges, repair work, or cleaning contracted for by the tenant.

The failure of a landlord to provide a written statement within the required time specified in subsection (1) of this section shall work a forfeiture of all his rights to withhold any portion of the security deposit under this section.

The willful retention of a security deposit in violation of this section shall render a landlord liable for treble the amount of that portion of the security deposit wrongfully withheld from the tenant, together with reasonable attorney fees and court costs; except that the tenant has the obligation to give notice to the landlord of his intention to file legal proceedings a minimum of seven days prior to filing said action.

In any court action brought by a tenant under this section, the landlord shall bear the burden of proving that his withholding of the security deposit or any portion of it was not wrongful.

Upon cessation of his interest in the dwelling unit, whether by sale, assignment, death, appointment of a receiver, or otherwise, the person in possession of the security deposit, including but not limited to the landlord, his agent, or his executor, shall, within a reasonable time:

Transfer the funds, or any remainder after lawful deductions under subsection (1) of this section, to the landlord’s successor in interest and notify the tenant by mail of such transfer and of the transferee’s name and address; or

Return the funds, or any remainder after lawful deductions under subsection (1) of this section, to the tenant.

Upon compliance with subsection (4) of this section, the person in possession of the security deposit shall be relieved of further liability.

Upon receipt of transferred funds under subsection (4)(a) of this section, the transferee, in relation to such funds, shall be deemed to have all of the rights and obligations of a landlord holding the funds as a security deposit.

Any provision, whether oral or written, in or pertaining to a rental agreement whereby any provision of this section for the benefit of a tenant or members of his household is waived shall be deemed to be against public policy and shall be void.

History.

Source:
L. 71:

P. 592, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 58-1-28.

L. 76:

(2) amended, p. 314, § 67, effective May 20.

38-12-104.
Return of security deposit - hazardous condition - gas appliance.

Anytime service personnel from any organization providing gas service to a residential building become aware of any hazardous condition of a gas appliance, piping, or other gas equipment, such personnel shall inform the customer of record at the affected address in writing of the hazardous condition and take any further action provided for by the policies of such personnel’s employer. Such written notification shall state the potential nature of the hazard as a fire hazard or a hazard to life, health, property, or public welfare and shall explain the possible cause of the hazard.

If the resident of the residential building is a tenant, such tenant shall immediately inform the landlord of the property or the landlord’s agent in writing of the existence of the hazard.

The landlord shall then have seventy-two hours excluding a Saturday, Sunday, or a legal holiday after the actual receipt of the written notice of the hazardous condition to have the hazardous condition repaired by a professional. “Professional” for the purposes of this section means a person authorized by the state of Colorado or by a county or municipal government through license or certificate where such government authorization is required. Where no person with such government authorization is available, and where there are no local requirements for government authorization, a person who is otherwise qualified and who possesses insurance with a minimum of one hundred thousand dollars public liability and property damage coverage shall be deemed a professional for purposes of this section. Proof of such repairs shall be forwarded to the landlord or the landlord’s agent. Such proof may also be used as an affirmative defense in any action to recover the security deposit, as provided for in this section.

If the landlord does not have the repairs made within seventy-two hours excluding a Saturday, Sunday, or a legal holiday, and the condition of the building remains hazardous, the tenant may opt to vacate the premises. After the tenant vacates the premises, the lease or other rental agreement between the landlord and tenant becomes null and void, all rights and future obligations between the landlord and tenant pursuant to the lease or other rental agreement terminate, and the tenant may demand the immediate return of all or any portion of the security deposit held by the landlord to which the tenant is entitled. The landlord shall have seventy-two hours following the tenant’s vacation of the premises to deliver to the tenant all of, or the appropriate portion of, the security deposit plus any rent rebate owed to the tenant for rent paid by the tenant for the period of time after the tenant has vacated. If the seventy-second hour falls on a Saturday, Sunday, or legal holiday, the security deposit must be delivered by noon on the next day that is not a Saturday, Sunday, or legal holiday. The tenant shall provide the landlord with a correct forwarding address. No security deposit shall be retained to cover normal wear and tear. In the event that actual cause exists for retaining any portion of the security deposit, the landlord shall provide the tenant with a written statement listing the exact reasons for the retention of any portion of the security deposit. When the statement is delivered, it shall be accompanied by payment of the difference between any sum deposited and the amount retained. The landlord is deemed to have complied with this section by mailing said statement and any payments required by this section to the forwarding address of the tenant. Nothing in this section shall preclude the landlord from withholding the security deposit for nonpayment of rent or for nonpayment of utility charges, repair work, or cleaning contracted for by the tenant. If the tenant does not receive the entire security deposit or a portion of the security deposit together with a written statement listing the exact reasons for the retention of any portion of the security deposit within the time period provided for in this section, the retention of the security deposit shall be deemed willful and wrongful and, notwithstanding the provisions of section 38-12-103 (3), shall entitle the tenant to twice the amount of the security deposit and to reasonable attorney fees.

History.

Source:
L. 91:

Entire section added, p. 1691, § 1, effective July 1.

38-12-105.
Late fees charged to tenants and mobile home owners - maximum late fee amounts - prohibited acts - penalties - period to cure violations - remedies - unfair or deceptive trade practice.

A landlord shall not take any of the following actions or direct any agent to take any of the following actions on the landlord’s behalf:

Charge a tenant or home owner a late fee unless a rent payment is late by at least seven calendar days;

Charge a tenant or home owner a late fee in an amount that exceeds the greater of:

Fifty dollars; or

Five percent of the amount of the past due rent payment;

Require a tenant or home owner to pay a late fee unless the late fee is disclosed in the rental agreement;

Remove or exclude a tenant from a dwelling or initiate a court process for the removal or exclusion of a tenant from a dwelling because the tenant fails to pay one or more late fees to the landlord;

Terminate a tenancy or other estate at will or a lease in a mobile home park because a tenant or home owner fails to pay one or more late fees to the landlord;

Impose a late fee on a tenant or home owner for the late payment or nonpayment of any portion of the rent that a rent subsidy provider, rather than the tenant or home owner, is responsible for paying;

Impose a late fee more than once for each late payment, except that a landlord may impose a late fee more than once for a late payment if the total amount of such late fees does not exceed the amount described in subsection (1)(b) of this section;

Require a tenant or home owner to pay any amount of interest on a late fee;

Recoup any amount of a late fee from a rent payment made to the landlord by a tenant or home owner; or

Charge a tenant or home owner a late fee unless the landlord provided the tenant or home owner written notice of the late fee within one hundred eighty days after the date upon which the rent payment was due.

A provision of a lease of a landlord or person acting on behalf of a landlord that does not comply with the provisions of subsection (1) of this section is void and unenforceable. A tenant who is aggrieved by an action taken by a landlord or person acting on behalf of the landlord in violation of subsection (1) of this section may bring an action for injunctive relief pursuant to subsection (5) of this section.

A landlord who violates subsection (1) of this section shall pay to an aggrieved tenant or home owner a penalty in the amount of fifty dollars for each violation.

Except as described in subsection (3) of this section, and notwithstanding any other provision of this section to the contrary, a landlord who violates subsection (1) of this section has seven days to cure the violation, which seven days begins when the landlord receives written or electronic notice of the violation.

If a landlord violates subsection (1) of this section and fails to timely cure the violation as described in subsection (4) of this section, a tenant or home owner may bring a civil action to seek one or more of the following remedies:

Compensatory damages for injury or loss suffered;

A penalty of at least one hundred fifty dollars but not more than one thousand dollars for each violation, payable to the tenant or home owner;

Costs, including reasonable attorney fees to the prevailing party; and

Other equitable relief the court finds appropriate.

A tenant or home owner may raise an alleged violation of this section as an affirmative defense in a forcible entry and detainer proceeding.

A late fee is distinct from rent, and a rental agreement may not classify a late fee as rent for the purposes of section 13-40-104 (1)(d).

History.

Source:
L. 2021:

Entire section added, (SB 21-173), ch. 349, p. 2266, § 8, effective October 1.